Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.245

Authority to stop vehicles carrying cattle or horses.

The director or any peace officer may stop vehicles carrying cattle or horses to determine if the livestock being transported are accompanied by a certificate of permit, inspection certificate, self-inspection certificate meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.010, or other satisfactory proof of ownership, as determined by the director.

[ 2010 c 66 s 10; 2003 c 326 s 29.]